Hawaii statutes.
§338-11 Form of certificates. The
forms of certificates shall include as a minimum the items required by the
respective standard certificates as recommended by the Public Health Service,
National Center for Health Statistics, subject to approval of and modification
by the department of health. In addition, the forms of death certificates
shall require the individual's social security number. The form and use of the
certificates shall be subject to sections 338-16 to 338-18. [L 1949, c 327,
§15; RL 1955, §57-14; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §338-11; am L 1997, c 293,
§17]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next